California statutes. Public Resources Code
 Control that the permitholder has failed to comply, and the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall prohibit the offering for sale of that beverage brand within the state.

(B) The department and the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall enter into a contract, pursuant to Section 14536.5, concerning the implementation of this paragraph, which shall include a provision reimbursing the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control for its costs incurred in implementing this paragraph. The department may expend the amount necessary for that reimbursement from the fund.

(b) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), a beverage container sold or offered for sale in the state has a refund value of four cents ($0.04) if the beverage container has a capacity of less than 24 fluid ounces and eight cents ($0.08) if the beverage container has a capacity of 24 fluid
 ounces or more.

(c) Commencing January 1, 2024, and notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a beverage container that is a box, bladder, or pouch, or similar container, containing wine or distilled spirits, as described in paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 14504, sold or offered for sale in the state shall have a redemption payment and refund value of twenty-five cents ($0.25).

(d) This section does not apply to a refillable beverage container.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 868, Sec. 7.   (SB 353)   Effective October 13, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14560.5.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), an invoice or other form of accounting of a transaction submitted by a beverage distributor of beverages to a dealer shall separately identify the amount of any redemption payment imposed on beverage containers pursuant to Section 14560 and the separate identification of the invoice or other form of accounting of the transaction shall not combine or include the gross wholesale price with the redemption payment but shall separately state the gross amount of the redemption payment for each type of container included in each delivery.

(2) An invoice or other form of accounting of a transaction submitted by a distributor of beer and malt beverages, wine and distilled spirit coolers, wine, wine from
 which alcohol has been removed, in whole or in part, whether or not sparkling or carbonated, or distilled spirits to a dealer may separately identify the portion of the gross wholesale price attributable to any redemption payment imposed on beverage containers pursuant to Section 14560 and the separate identification of the invoice or other form of accounting of the transaction may separately state the gross amount of the redemption payment for each type of container included in each delivery. The invoice or other form of accounting of this transaction may separately identify the portion of the gross wholesale price attributable to the redemption payment.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 14541, the department shall randomly inspect beverage distributor invoices or other forms of accounting to ensure compliance with this subdivision. However, an unintentional error in addition or subtraction on an invoice or other form of accounting by a route driver
 of a distributor shall not be deemed a violation of this subdivision.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, the term “type of container” includes the amount of the redemption payment on containers under 24 ounces and on containers 24 ounces or more.

(b) To the extent technically and economically feasible, a dealer may separately identify the amount of any redemption payment on the customer cash register receipt provided to the consumer, by the dealer, that is applied to the purchase of a beverage container.

(c) (1) A dealer shall separately identify the amount of any redemption payment imposed on a beverage container in all advertising of beverage products and on the shelf labels of the dealer’s establishment. The separate identification shall be accomplished by stating one of the following:

(A) The price of the beverage product plus a descriptive term, as described in paragraph (2).

(B) The price of the beverage product plus the amount of the applicable redemption payment and a descriptive term, as described in paragraph (2).

(C) The price of the beverage product plus the amount of the applicable redemption payment, a descriptive term, as described in paragraph (2), and the total of these two amounts.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the redemption payment shall be identified by one of the following descriptive terms: “California Redemption Value,” “CA Redemption Value,” “CRV,” “California Cash Refund,” “CA Cash Refund,” or any other message specified in Section 14561.

(3) A
 dealer shall not include the redemption payment in the total price of a beverage container in any advertising or on the shelf of the dealer’s establishment.

(4) This subdivision applies only to a dealer at a dealer location with a sales and storage area totaling more than 4,000 square feet.

(5) The penalties specified in Sections 14591 and 14591.1 shall not apply to a person who violates this subdivision.

(6) For purposes of paragraph (1), the shelf labels for a beverage that is included within the scope of this division beginning on January 1, 2024, but that was not subject to this division before that date, are not required until January 15, 2024.

(d) With regard to the sale of beer and other malt beverages, wine and distilled spirit cooler beverages,
 wine, wine from which alcohol has been removed, in whole or in part, whether or not sparkling or carbonated, and distilled spirits, any amount of redemption payment imposed by this division is subject to Section 25509 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 868, Sec. 8.   (SB 353)   Effective October 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14561.

(a) A beverage manufacturer shall clearly indicate on all beverage containers sold or offered for sale by that beverage manufacturer in the state the message “CA Redemption Value,” “California Redemption Value,” “CA Cash Refund,” “California Cash Refund,” or “CA CRV,” by etching, embossing, or printing the beverage container or by securely affixing a clear and prominent stamp, label, or other device to the beverage container.

(b) A refillable beverage container sold or offered for sale is exempt from this section. However, a beverage
 manufacturer or container manufacturer may place upon, or affix to, a refillable beverage container any message that the manufacturer determines to be appropriate relating to the refund value of the beverage container.

(c) A person shall not offer to sell, or sell, to a consumer, a beverage container subject to subdivision (a) that has not been labeled pursuant to this section, except for a refillable beverage container that is exempt from labeling pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) The department may require that a beverage container intended for sale in the state be printed, embossed, stamped, labeled, or otherwise marked with a scan code, a quick response (QR) code, or a universal product code or similar machine-readable
 indicia, which shall be at least one-half inch in size, but may, at the discretion of the beverage manufacturer, be larger in size. If the beverage container is eligible to be labeled with a chasing arrows symbol in compliance with Section 42355.51, a chasing arrows symbol may be used inside the machine-readable label in lieu of the message “DEPOSIT” adjacent to or within the machine-readable indicia. For purposes of this subdivision, “chasing arrows symbol” means an equilateral triangle, formed by three arrows curved at their midpoints, depicting a clockwise path, with a short gap separating the apex of each arrow from the base of the adjacent arrow.

(e) A beverage container labeled with the message specified in subdivision (a) shall have the minimum redemption payment established pursuant to Section 14560, which shall be paid by the distributor to the department pursuant to Section 14574.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other requirement of this section, all of the following shall apply:

(A) A beverage container that is included within the scope of this division beginning on January 1, 2024, but that was not subject to this division before that date, shall be exempt from the labeling requirements of this section until July 1, 2026.

(B) A beverage container that is included within the scope of this division beginning on January 1, 2024, but that was not subject to this division before that date, and that was filled and labeled before
 July 1, 2025, shall be exempt from the labeling requirements of this section.

(C) A beverage container containing a beverage described in paragraph (7) or (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 14504 that is included within the scope of this division beginning on January 1, 2024, but that was not subject to this division before that date, and that was filled and labeled before July 1, 2024, shall be exempt from the labeling requirements of this section.

(2) A beverage container described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (1) shall be considered an “empty beverage container” for purposes of this division as of January 1, 2024.

(g) Notwithstanding any other requirement in statute or regulation, including, but not limited to, paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section
 2200 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, wine and distilled spirit manufacturers licensed pursuant to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code) shall not be required to provide samples of proposed labels or beverage containers to the department for approval before the sale or transfer of beverage containers in the state. The department shall provide the relevant labeling criteria to those wine and distilled spirit manufacturers, which the manufacturers shall use to self-certify compliance with that criteria on their registration materials submitted to the department under this division. A manufacturer may request assistance from the department in determining compliance with the labeling criteria.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 562, Sec. 4.   (AB 720)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14562.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the minimum redemption payment established by this article is a regulatory fee collected for the purpose of assuring the return for recycling of a greater percentage of the beverage containers sold in this state, and is beneficial to the beverage industry by assuring the more reliable availability of raw materials. Accordingly, the payments of redemption payments to the department for deposit in the California Beverage Container Recycling Fund are not the “proceeds of taxes,” as that term is used in subdivision (c) of Section 8 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, and the disbursement or encumbrance of money in the fund is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1339, Sec. 29.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Returns [14570. - 14576.]

14570.

(a) Every dealer shall post a clear and conspicuous sign of at least 10 inches by 15 inches at each public entrance to the dealer’s place of business that specifies one of the following:

(1) The name and address, as provided by the department, of at least the certified recycling center, location, or locations, nearest to the dealer, that redeems all types of empty beverage containers consistent with Section 14571.

(2) One of the following procedures for redeeming beverage containers is available, pursuant to Section 14578:

(A) Beverage containers may be redeemed at all open cash registers within this place of
 business.

(B) Beverage containers may be redeemed at one specific location on the dealer’s premises that is identified on the sign.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 21) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 22.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14571.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there shall be at least one certified recycling center or location within every convenience zone that accepts and pays the refund value, if any, at one location for all types of empty beverage containers and is open for business during at least 30 hours per week with a minimum of five hours of operation occurring during periods other than from Monday to Friday, from 9 a.m. to 5 p.m.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department may require a certified recycling center to operate up to 50 percent of its hours of operation other than during 9 a.m. to 5 p.m.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the department may certify a recycling center that will operate less than 30 hours per week, if either of the following conditions are met:

(A) The recycling center is in a rural region. For purposes of this subparagraph, “rural region” means a nonurban area identified by the department on an annual basis using the loan eligibility criteria of the Rural Housing Service of the United States Department of Agriculture, Rural Development Administration, or its successor agency. Those criteria include, but are not limited to, places, open country, cities, towns, or census designated places with populations that are less than 10,000 persons. The department may designate an area with a population of between 10,000 and 50,000 persons as a rural region,
 unless the area is identified as part of, or associated with, an urban area, as determined by the department on an individual basis.

(B) The needs of the community and the goals of this division will be best served by certification of the operation as a recycling center.

(2) A recycling center that is certified pursuant to paragraph (1) shall post a sign indicating the location of the nearest recycling center that is open at least 30 hours per week and that will accept all material types.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), on or before July 1, 2022, the department shall develop and implement a process pursuant to which a certified recycling center can
 apply to the department for authorization to operate on an alternative schedule. For purposes of this paragraph, “alternative schedule” means a schedule other than the schedule specified in subdivision (a) or that may be required by the department pursuant to subdivision (b), including reduced hours of operation.

(B) The department shall include in the process developed pursuant to subparagraph (A), at a minimum, all of the following:

(i) The form and content of the application required to be submitted to the department by a certified recycling center seeking to operate on an
 alternative schedule, and the manner in which the application shall be submitted to the department.

(ii) The criteria used by the department to authorize a certified recycling center to operate on an alternative schedule, which shall include, but are not limited to, providing flexibility for certified recycling centers that are owned or operated by small or family-owned businesses and centers that are experiencing operational challenges due to natural disasters or states of emergency, as determined by the department.

(iii) A minimum number of hours per week, per month, or per year that a recycling center may be open for
 business and still meet the requirements of subdivision (d).

(iv) Any other requirements the department deems necessary for a certified recycling center to operate on an alternative schedule and still meet the requirements of subdivision (d).

(d) Before establishing operating hours for a certified recycling center pursuant to subdivision (c), the department shall make a determination that this action is necessary to further the goals of this division and that the proposed operating hours will not significantly decrease the ability of consumers to conveniently return beverage containers for the refund value to a certified recycling center redeeming all material types.

(e) (1) For purposes of this
 section, if a certified recycling center or location is staffed and is not a reverse vending machine or a bag drop recycling center, the certified recycling center is “open for business” if all of the following requirements are met:

(A) An employee of the certified recycling center or location is present during the hours of operation and available to the public to accept containers and to pay the refund values.

(B) In addition to the sign specified in subdivision (j), a sign having a minimum size of two feet by two feet is posted at the certified recycling center or location indicating that the certified recycling center or location is open. Where allowed by local zoning requirements or where zoning restrictions apply, the sign shall be of the maximum allowable size.

(C) The prices paid, by weight or per container, are posted at the location.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for purposes of this section, until January 1, 2023, a certified recycling center or location that is not a reverse vending machine or a bag drop recycling center is “open for business” if the certified recycling center or location receives written authorization from the department to operate pursuant to an appointment system during the hours of operation and the certified recycling center or location meets both of the following requirements:

(i) The certified recycling center or location ensures that an employee of the certified recycling center or location is present during all appointments and available to accept containers and to pay the refund values.

(ii) The certified recycling center or location meets the requirements of subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1).

(B) The department shall authorize a certified recycling center or location to operate pursuant to an appointment system under subparagraph (A) only if the department determines that high customer demand, weather, or public health and safety concerns warrant the implementation of an appointment system at the certified recycling center or location.

(f) (1) Except as provided in subdivisions (g) and (i), for the purpose of this section, if the recycling center consists of reverse vending machines or other unmanned automated equipment, or is a bag drop recycling center, the center is “open for business” if the equipment or bag drop is properly functioning, accepting all types of empty beverage containers at the recycling location, and paying posted refund values no less than the minimums required by this division.

(2) A recycling center that meets the requirements in paragraph (1) shall not be required to have an employee present during the hours of operation in order to be “open for business.”

(g) If a recycling center consists of reverse vending machines or other automated equipment, or is a bag
 drop recycling center, the recycling center is “open for business” if the equipment or bag drop is properly functioning, and accepting all types of empty beverage containers at one physical recycling location within the recycling location.

(h) Whenever a recycling center that is a reverse vending machine is not “open for business” during the hours of operation
 required and posted pursuant to this section and Section 14570, the dealer that is hosting the reverse vending machine at its place of business shall redeem all empty beverage container types at all open cash registers or one designated location at the store, as specified on the sign required pursuant to subdivision (j).

(i) (1) A recycling center that is a reverse vending machine or a bag drop recycling center that accepts all types of empty beverage containers except those that are three or more liters in volume and those that are pouches is open for business if it does both of the following:

(A) Provides an attendant to accept all types of empty beverage containers for no less than 10 hours per week, with no less than five of those hours on a
 weekend day between the hours of 9 a.m. and 5 p.m.

(B) Is operational and functioning properly for no less than 70 hours per week.

(2) A handling fee shall not be paid to a recycling center described in paragraph (1) if the recycling center is located in a convenience zone in which a preexisting certified recycling center is located. Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 14585, a preexisting certified recycling center located in the same convenience zone as a recycling center described in paragraph (1) shall continue to be eligible to receive handling fee payments.

(3) The department shall pay handling fees to a recycling center described in paragraph (1), and the recycling center shall pay
 refund values, on the basis of the number of beverage containers redeemed through the reverse vending machine or bag drop, and not on the basis of weight. The department shall determine the method of certifying the validity of the number of beverage containers counted by the reverse vending machine or bag drop.

(j) In addition to the sign specified in
 subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), each reverse vending machine shall be posted with a clear and conspicuous sign on or near the reverse vending machine that states that beverage containers may be redeemed by the host dealer if the machine is nonoperational at any time during the required hours of operation, pursuant to subdivision (h). The department shall determine the size and location of the sign and the message required to be printed on the sign.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 506, Sec. 6.   (AB 1311)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14571.1.

On or before January 1 of each year, the department shall, on a statewide basis, designate all convenience zones as of that date, including convenience zones in underserved areas, and shall prepare a map or maps showing these convenience zones.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 696, Sec. 14.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14571.2.

The department shall continuously assist dealers and recyclers to establish certified recycling locations within each convenience zone. This assistance includes, but is not limited to, providing information to companies and organizations interested in operating recycling in the convenience zone; providing dealers with names of prospective recyclers for the convenience zone and providing recyclers with the names of dealers in need of a recycler for a convenience zone; providing dealers and recyclers with information on grants, advertising funds, and other resources available; and providing recyclers with advice regarding appearance and image of the recycling center and the efficient handling and transportation of recycled beverage containers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1528, Sec. 17.   Effective September 29, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

14571.3.

(a) The department shall continuously assist any certified recycler to achieve greater service to the public in an economical and cost-effective manner. This assistance shall include, but not be limited to, advice on all of the following:

(1) Methods to enhance public participation in recycling.

(2) The most beneficial location, siting, and image of a recycling location. 

(3) Methods to reduce costs and optimize efficiencies of existing resources.

(b) The department shall conduct regular, unannounced inspections of certified recycling centers for the purpose of determining that the requirements of this division are satisfied. The department shall assess civil penalties pursuant to Section 14591.1 for violations at certified recycling centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 874, Sec. 8.   Effective October 14, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14571.4.

(a) (1) The department shall certify one operator to establish the Pacific Beach Mobile Recycling Program that incorporates all convenience zones in the Pacific Beach area of San Diego County.

(2) For the purposes of this section, “the Pacific Beach area of San Diego County” means the area designated in the Pacific Beach Community Plan.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 14570 and 14571, all convenience zones within the Pacific Beach area of San Diego County shall be considered served if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The recycling center operator meets all of the following conditions:

(A) The center is open for business at least once each week at a number of locations equal to the number of convenience zones in the Pacific Beach area of San Diego County as determined by the department annually, three of which are within existing convenience zones in the Pacific Beach area of San Diego County.

(B) The center is open for business at least eight hours per day at each location.

(C) The center agrees to accept, and pay the refund value for, all eligible beverage container types.

(D) The center is certified by the department for operation in the number of locations equal to the number of convenience zones in the Pacific Beach area of San Diego County, as determined by the department.

(2) All dealers within the Pacific Beach area of San Diego County post a clear and conspicuous sign of at least 10 inches by 15 inches at each public entrance to the dealer’s place of business, indicating the location, hours, and day of operation for each recycling location within the Pacific Beach area.

(c) A recycling center operator approved by the department, that meets the conditions prescribed in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b), shall be designated a certified recycling center and shall be eligible to apply for handling fees pursuant to Section 14585 and to receive from processors the amounts specified in subdivision (a) of Section 14573.5 for refund values, administrative costs, and processing payments.

(d) If the department determines that it is necessary to adopt or revise regulations to implement this section, the regulations shall be adopted or revised as emergency regulations. The Office of Administrative Law shall consider these emergency regulations to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, and the general welfare for the purposes of Section 11349.6 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding the 120-day period provided for in subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, the emergency regulations shall be repealed 180 days from the effective date of the regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 488, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14571.5.

The department may, in a rural region, as identified pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 14571, upon petition by an interested person, do either of the following:

(a) (1) Increase a convenience zone to include the area up to a five-mile radius of a supermarket, if the expanded convenience zone would then be served by a single existing certified recycling center or location.

(2) This subdivision applies only to a convenience zone that is otherwise
 not being served by a certified recycling center or location meeting the requirements of Section 14571 or is exempted by the department pursuant to Section 14571.8.

(b) (1) Designate a convenience zone pursuant to Section 14571.1 in an area where there is no supermarket, but with two or more dealers located within a one-mile radius of each other, and that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The dealers in that area have combined gross annual sales of two million dollars ($2,000,000) or more, as certified by the petitioner in an affidavit filed with the petition.

(B) The convenience zone encompasses a three-mile radius, with the center of the zone established at the dealer, located closest to the existing recycling center specified in subparagraph (D).

(C) The convenience zone does not overlap any other existing convenience zone.

(D) The convenience zone is served by a single existing certified recycling center.

(2) The department shall identify the dealer locations only for the purpose of providing a reference point in the establishment of the convenience zone pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) If the existing recycling location in a convenience zone designated pursuant to this subdivision ceases operations, the convenience zone shall also cease to exist until a new recycling location is established, and the department is petitioned by an interested person to designate a convenience zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 23.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14571.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, all of the following apply if a reverse vending machine is certified to operate as a recycling center:

(1) The reverse vending machine shall not make an unserved convenience zone served, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 14571, regardless of the number of hours it operates. The reverse vending machine shall still be required to operate the minimum hours specified in Section 14571.

(2) A reverse vending machine located in a convenience zone shall not preclude either of the following from operating and receiving program payments in the same
 convenience zone:

(A) A dealer cooperative under Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 14578).

(B) A mobile unit as defined in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) The reverse vending machine located in a convenience zone shall not make an existing recycling center certified in that convenience zone ineligible for handling fees pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14585.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), a reverse vending machine that is certified as a recycling center remains subject to all laws and regulations applicable to recycling
 centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 319, Sec. 2.   (SB 955)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14571.7.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), in any convenience zone where a recycling location or locations were initially established, but where the location or locations cease to operate in accordance with Section 14571, the department shall notify all dealers within that convenience zone that a recycling location is required to be established within 60 days. If, within 30 days of the notification, a recycling location that satisfies the requirements of Section 14571 has not been established, the department shall notify all dealers within that zone, and one or more dealers within that zone shall establish, or cause to be established, a recycling location.

(b) In any convenience zone where a recycling location or locations were initially established, but where the location or locations cease to operate in accordance with Section 14571, the department shall determine, pursuant to Section 14571.8, if the convenience zone is eligible for an exemption. If the convenience zone meets all of the requirements for an exemption pursuant to Section 14571.8, the department shall grant one exemption. If the department determines that a convenience zone is not eligible for an exemption pursuant to subdivision (a) and Section 14571.8, the department shall notify all dealers within that convenience zone that a recycling location is required to be established within 60 days. If, within 30 days of the notification, a recycling location that satisfies the requirements of Section 14571 has not been established, the department shall notify all dealers within that zone, and one or more dealers within that zone shall establish, or cause to be established, a recycling location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 696, Sec. 15.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14571.8.

(a) No lease entered into by a dealer after January 1, 1987, may contain a leasehold restriction that prohibits or results in the prohibition of the establishment of a recycling location.

(b) The director may grant an exemption from the requirements of Section 14571 for an individual convenience zone only after the department solicits public testimony on whether or not to provide an exemption from Section 14571. The solicitation process shall be designed by the department to ensure that operators of recycling centers, dealers, and members of the public in the jurisdiction affected by the proposed exemption are aware of the proposed exemption. After evaluation of the testimony and any field review conducted, the
 department shall base a decision to exempt a convenience zone on one, or any combination, of the following factors:

(1) The exemption will not significantly decrease the ability of consumers to conveniently return beverage containers for the refund value to a certified recycling center redeeming all material types.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (5), the nearest certified recycling center is within a reasonable distance of the convenience zone being considered from exemption.

(3) The convenience zone is in the area of a curbside recycling program that meets the criteria specified in Section 14509.5.

(4) The requirements of Section 14571 cannot be met in a particular convenience zone due to local zoning or the dealer’s leasehold restrictions for
 leases in effect on January 1, 1987, and the local zoning or leasehold restrictions are not within the authority of the department and the dealer. However, any lease executed after January 1, 1987, shall meet the requirements specified in subdivision (a).

(5) The convenience zone has redeemed less than 60,000 containers per month for the prior 12 months and, notwithstanding paragraph (2), a certified recycling center is located within one mile of the convenience zone that is the subject of the exemption.

(c) The department shall review each convenience zone in which a certified recycling center was not located on January 1, 1996, to determine the eligibility of the convenience zone under the exemption criteria specified in subdivision (b).

(d) The total number of exemptions granted by the director under this section
 shall not exceed 15 percent of the total number of convenience zones identified pursuant to this section.

(e) The department may, on its own motion, or upon petition by any interested person, revoke a convenience zone exemption if either of the following occurs:

(1) The condition or conditions that caused the convenience zone to be exempt no longer exists, and the department determines that the criteria for an exemption specified in this section are not presently applicable to the convenience zone.

(2) The department determines that the convenience zone exemption was granted due to an administrative error.

(f) If an exemption is revoked and a recycling center is not certified and operational in the convenience zone, the department shall, within 10 days of the date of the decision to revoke, serve all dealers in the convenience zone with the notice specified in subdivision (a) of Section 14571.7.

(g) An exemption shall not be revoked when a recycling center becomes certified and operational within an exempt convenience zone unless either of the events specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (e) occurs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 25.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14571.9.

(a) (1) Until January 1, 2032, the department may approve up to 10 recycling pilot projects that meet the requirements of this section.

(2) The pilot projects, which shall be submitted by applicant jurisdictions, shall be designed to improve redemption opportunities in unserved convenience zones. It is the intent of the Legislature to create new, convenient recycling opportunities to improve consumer redemption of eligible beverage containers and increase recycling rates in jurisdictions served by pilot projects and to provide recycling opportunities to improve consumer redemption of eligible containers in pilot project areas, including in rural areas.

(3) Unless otherwise specified in or authorized by the department under this section, a pilot project operator shall be subject to all requirements imposed on recycling centers as specified in this division and any implementing regulations, except for the requirements specified in Sections 14570 and 14571.

(4) If a pilot project ends before January 1, 2032, the department may consider additional pilot project proposals, but not more than 10 pilot projects may operate at the same time.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Sections 14570, 14571, and 14578, until January 1, 2027, a convenience zone that falls within the area of a
 pilot project approved by the department under this section shall be deemed served if the pilot project is operational.

(2) (A) A dealer within the jurisdiction of a pilot project shall post a clear and conspicuous sign of at least 10 inches by 15 inches at each public entrance to the dealer’s place of business that specifies the name of the pilot project location nearest to the dealer, as provided by the department, the days and hours of operation of the pilot project location, and the toll-free telephone number established by the department under subparagraph (B). This information shall be kept accurate and up to date.

(B) The department shall establish a toll-free telephone number and an internet website to disseminate information regarding beverage container recycling opportunities.

(3) If a pilot project ceases operation or the pilot project’s certification has been revoked by the department, a dealer in the convenience zone served by the pilot project shall comply with Sections 14570, 14571, and 14578. The department shall inform all dealers within a convenience zone of any change in status of a pilot project serving that convenience zone within 10 calendar days.

(c) The requirements for a pilot project shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A pilot project shall serve one of the following:

(A) At least three unserved convenience zones.

(B) One or more convenience zones impacting a total of at least 30 dealers in unserved convenience zones.

(C) A rural region.

(2) A pilot project shall be in a jurisdiction that, as of the effective date of the pilot project application, meets at least one of the following conditions:

(A) Had at least six unserved convenience zones.

(B) Had 75 percent of the convenience zones in the jurisdiction unserved.

(C) Is located in a rural region.

(3) A pilot project shall not establish a location for redeeming a beverage container for its refund value that is outside of the pilot project area.

(4) A pilot project recycler may be located anywhere within the pilot project area.

(5) A pilot project shall be served only by a pilot project recycler that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The pilot project recycler shall be open a minimum of one weekday per week for at least eight hours.

(B) In addition to the requirement in subparagraph (C), the
 pilot project recycler shall be open at least five hours per week during periods other than from Monday through Friday from 9 a.m. to 5 p.m.

(C) The pilot project recycler shall be open at least eight hours per week during the weekend.
